Nevada, session 83, AB531.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 387.12463 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
387.12463 1. The Commission shall:
(a) Provide guidance to school districts and the Department on
the implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan.
(b) Monitor the implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding
Plan and make any recommendations to the Joint Interim Standing
-
*AB531*

– 3 –
Committee on Education that the Commission determines would,
within the limits of appropriated funding, improve the
implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan or correct any
deficiencies of the Department or any school district or public
school in carrying out the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan.
(c) Review the statewide base per pupil funding amount, the
adjusted base per pupil funding for each school district and the
multiplier for weighted funding for each category of pupils
appropriated by law pursuant to NRS 387.1214 for each biennium
and recommend any revisions the Commission determines to be
appropriate to create an optimal level of funding for the public
schools in this State, including, without limitation, by
recommending the creation or elimination of one or more categories
of pupils to receive additional weighted funding. If the Commission
makes a recommendation pursuant to this paragraph which would
require more money to implement than was appropriated from the
State Education Fund in the immediately preceding biennium,
the Commission shall also identify a method to fully fund the
recommendation within 10 years after the date of the
recommendation.
(d) Review the laws and regulations of this State relating to
education, make recommendations to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education for any revision of such laws and
regulations that the Commission determines would improve the
efficiency or effectiveness of public education in this State and
notify each school district of each such recommendation.
(e) Review and recommend to the Department revisions of the
cost adjustment factors for each county established pursuant to NRS
387.1215 and the method for calculating the attendance area
adjustment established pursuant to NRS 387.1218.
(f) Review the academic progress made by pupils in each public
school since the implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding
Plan, including, without limitation, any changes to the academic
progress of such pupils as the result of any additional money
provided to each such school by the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan.
In performing such a review, the Commission shall:
(1) Use metrics to measure the academic achievement of
pupils which include, without limitation:
(I) The rate of graduation of pupils from high school by
type of diploma;
(II) The performance of pupils on standardized
examinations in math, reading and science;
(III) The number of credentials or other certifications in
fields of career and technical education earned by pupils;
-
*AB531*

– 4 –
(IV) The number of pupils who earn a passing score on an
advanced placement examination;
(V) The number of pupils who earn a passing score on an
international baccalaureate examination;
(VI) The percentage of pupils in each school who lack a
sufficient number of credits to graduate by the end of their 12th
grade year;
(VII) The percentage of pupils in each school who drop
out;
(VIII) The number of pupils who enroll in higher
education upon graduation;
(IX) The number of pupils who enroll in a vocational or
technical school or apprenticeship training program;
(X) The attendance rate for pupils;
(XI) The number of violent acts by pupils and
disciplinary actions against pupils; and
(XII) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(2) Use metrics to measure the improvement of pupils
enrolled in elementary school in literacy which include, without
limitation:
(I) The literacy rate for pupils in the first, third and fifth
grades;
(II) The number of pupils in elementary school who were
promoted to the next grade after testing below proficient in reading
in the immediately preceding school year, separated by grade level
and by level of performance on the relevant test;
(III) The number of schools that employ a licensed
teacher designated to serve as a literacy specialist pursuant to NRS
388.159 and the number of schools that fail to employ and designate
such a licensed teacher; and
(IV) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(3) Use metrics to measure the ability of public schools to
hire and retain sufficient staff to meet the needs of the public
schools which include, without limitation:
(I) The rate of vacancies in positions for teachers, support
staff and administrators;
(II) The attendance rate for teachers;
(III) The retention rate for teachers;
(IV) The number of schools and classrooms within each
school in which the number of pupils in attendance exceeds the
designed capacity for the school or classroom;
(V) The number of classes taught by a substitute teacher
for more than 25 percent of the school year; and
(VI) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
-
*AB531*

– 5 –
(4) Use metrics to measure the extent to which schools meet
the needs and expectations of pupils, parents or legal guardians of
pupils, teachers and administrators which include, without
limitation:
(I) The results of an annual survey of satisfaction of
school employees;
(II) The results of an annual survey of satisfaction of
pupils, parents or legal guardians of pupils and graduates; and
(III) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(5) Identify the progress made by each school, school district
and charter school on improving the literacy of pupils enrolled in
elementary school;
(6) Make recommendations for strategies to increase the
efficacy, efficiency, transparency and accountability of public
schools; and
(7) Make recommendations to the Department, school
districts and charter schools to improve the reporting, tracking,
monitoring, analyzing and dissemination of data relating to pupil
achievement and financial accountability, including, without
limitation, revisions to the metrics identified in subparagraphs (1) to
(4), inclusive.
(g) Review and consider strategies to improve the accessibility
and ensure the equitability of existing and new programs for pupils
within and between public schools, including, without limitation,
open zoning.
2. Each school district and each charter school shall submit a
quarterly report to the Commission that identifies how funding from
the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan is being used to improve the
academic performance and progress of pupils and includes, without
limitation, all data or metrics collected by the school district or
charter school to demonstrate such improvement. The Commission
shall review the reports submitted pursuant to this subsection and
transmit the reports, along with any commentary or
recommendations relating to the reports, to the Governor, the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau, the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education and the Interim Finance
Committee [.] on or before the Friday of the second full week of
November.
3. After receiving the reports submitted to the Commission
pursuant to subsection 2, the Governor may, with the approval of the
Legislature or Interim Finance Committee if the Legislature is not in
session, direct a school district or charter school to take such
remedial actions as the Governor determines to be necessary and
appropriate to address any deficiency identified in the reports
submitted pursuant to subsection 2.
-
*AB531*

– 6 –
4. The Commission shall:
(a) Present any recommendations pursuant to paragraphs (a) to
(g), inclusive, of subsection 1 at a meeting of the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education for consideration and
recommendations by the Committee; and
(b) After consideration of the recommendations of the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Education, transmit the
recommendations or a revised version of the recommendations to
the Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
distribution to the Legislature.
Sec. 2. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act.
Sec. 3. 1. The Department shall establish a dashboard, or
use an existing platform that is appropriate for such services, for
tracking attendance data for pupils and displaying the data to the
Department and the board of trustees of each school district in
real time.
2. The board of trustees of each school district shall:
(a) Use the dashboard established pursuant to subsection 1 to,
each day, report attendance data from each school in the school
district; and
(b) Monitor the data reported to the dashboard pursuant to
paragraph (a) to, without limitation:
(1) Identify potential issues with the attendance of pupils;
and
(2) Notify the principal of a school if a pupil enrolled in the
school to which the principal is assigned is on track to be absent
for at least 10 percent of the school year.
3. The Department shall:
(a) On the Internet website maintained by the Department,
publish any trends or rates related to absenteeism in school
districts and schools that are based on the data reported to the
dashboard pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2; and
(b) Ensure that the use of a dashboard pursuant to this section
complies with any policies and procedures adopted pursuant to
NRS 388.267.
Sec. 4. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
appoint a task force to develop a rubric used to compare the
academic performance of pupils in this State to the academic
performance of pupils in other states.
2. The task force must consist of any members the
Superintendent of Public Instruction deems appropriate.
3. The task force shall, in developing a rubric pursuant to
subsection 1, include, without limitation, the metrics set forth in
-
*AB531*

– 7 –
subparagraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of paragraph (f) of subsection
1 of NRS 387.12463.
4. The Department shall:
(a) Regularly use the rubric to compare the performance of
pupils in this State to the performance of pupils in other states;
and
(b) Publish, on the Internet website maintained by the
Department, the results of the comparison made pursuant to
paragraph (a).
Sec. 5. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
appoint a committee on the use of artificial intelligence in
education within the Department.
2. The committee must consist of any members the
Superintendent of Public Instruction deems appropriate, provided
that such members include persons who possess expertise in
artificial intelligence and methods of instruction that are evidence-
based and effective.
3. The committee shall review, study and make
recommendations concerning the use of artificial intelligence in
education in this State. In performing its duties, the committee
shall consider, without limitation:
(a) The uses and applications of artificial intelligence in
education, including, without limitation, for the purposes of
instruction; and
(b) The concerns regarding the use of artificial intelligence in
education, including, without limitation, any potential for artificial
intelligence to affect bullying, cyberbullying, the collection of data
concerning pupils, the development of curricula and academic
honesty.
4. The committee shall, not later than August 1 of each even-
numbered year, submit to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Education any recommendations for legislation relating to the
subjects reviewed and studied by the committee pursuant to
subsection 3.
5. As used in this section, “academic honesty” means the
academic performance of pupils that is not influenced by
plagiarism or cheating.
Sec. 6. NRS 388.887 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.887 1. The State Board shall create a subcommittee to
review and make recommendations on the manner in which to
provide age-appropriate and historically accurate instruction about
the Holocaust and other genocides, such as the Armenian,
Cambodian, Darfur, Guatemalan and Rwandan genocides, in social
studies and language arts courses of study.
-
*AB531*

– 8 –
2. The review conducted and any recommendations made by
the subcommittee pursuant to this section must include, without
limitation:
(a) The manner in which to modify the curricula of relevant
courses in social studies and language arts to include the instruction
described in this section;
(b) An inventory of available classroom resources for educators
to meet the requirements of this section;
(c) The professional development that may be necessary or
appropriate for a teacher who provides the instruction described in
this section; and
(d) Consideration of any similar instruction provided in another
state or school district.
3. The subcommittee shall link current standards with
community resources that may assist in the implementation of the
instruction described in subsection 1. The subcommittee shall
review the manner in which the current standards support
comprehensive education regarding the Holocaust and other
genocides, such as the Armenian, Cambodian, Darfur, Guatemalan
and Rwandan genocides, including, without limitation, by:
(a) Preparing pupils to confront the immorality of the Holocaust,
other genocides, such as the Armenian, Cambodian, Darfur,
Guatemalan and Rwandan genocides, and other acts of mass
violence and to reflect on the causes of related historical events;
(b) Addressing the breadth of the history of the Holocaust,
including, without limitation, the dictatorship of the Third Reich, the
system of concentration camps, the persecution of both Jewish and
non-Jewish people, the resistance to the Third Reich and the
Holocaust by both Jewish and non-Jewish people and the various
trials that occurred after the end of World War II;
(c) Developing the respect of pupils for cultural diversity and
helping pupils to gain insight into the importance of international
human rights for all people;
(d) Promoting the understanding of pupils of how the Holocaust
contributed to the need for the term “genocide” and led to
international legislation that recognized genocide as a crime;
(e) Communicating the impact of personal responsibility, civic
engagement and societal responsiveness;
(f) Stimulating the reflection of pupils on the role and
responsibility of citizens in democratic societies to combat
misinformation, indifference and discrimination through the
development of critical thinking skills and through tools of
resistance such as protest, reform and celebration;
(g) Providing pupils with opportunities to contextualize and
analyze patterns of human behavior by persons and groups who
-
*AB531*

– 9 –
belong in one or more categories, including, without limitation,
perpetrator, collaborator, bystander, victim and rescuer;
(h) Enabling pupils to understand the ramifications of prejudice,
racism and stereotyping;
(i) Preserving the memories of survivors of genocide and
providing opportunities for pupils to discuss and honor the cultural
legacies of survivors;
(j) Providing pupils with a foundation for examining the history
of discrimination in this State;
(k) Including in curricula the use of personal narratives and
multimedia primary source materials, which may include, without
limitation, video testimony, photographs, artwork, diary entries,
letters, government documents, maps and poems; and
(l) Exploring the various mechanisms of transitional and
restorative justice that help humanity move forward in the aftermath
of genocide.
4. The subcommittee must be composed of the Superintendent
of Public Instruction, or his or her designee, and the following
members appointed by the Superintendent:
(a) Three members representing the Governor’s Advisory
Council on Education Relating to the Holocaust created by
NRS 233G.020;
(b) Three members representing nonprofit organizations that
have developed curricula regarding the Holocaust for use in public
schools;
(c) At least one member representing a school district in which
60,000 or more pupils are enrolled;
(d) At least one member representing a school district in which
fewer than 60,000 pupils are enrolled;
(e) At least one member representing a charter school located in
this State;
(f) At least one member representing nonprofit organizations
that have developed curricula for use in public schools regarding the
Armenian genocide; and
(g) At least one member representing nonprofit organizations
that have developed curricula for use in public schools regarding
genocides other than the Holocaust and the Armenian genocide.
5. On or before [October] August 1 of each even-numbered
year, the State Board shall report its findings and any
recommendations to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Education, including, without limitation, any recommendations
made by the subcommittee pursuant to subsection 1, as well as any
actions the State Board has taken or intends to take to include the
instruction in the relevant courses pursuant to subsection 2.
-
*AB531*

– 10 –
6. On or before February 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education shall consider the
report submitted by the State Board and prepare and submit a
written report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Legislature concerning the Committee’s
consideration of the matters described in this section and any
recommendations for legislation to ensure the instruction described
in this section is included in the curricula for the relevant courses.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Genocide” means any of the following acts committed with
intent to destroy, in whole or in part, a national, ethnic, racial or
religious group and includes, without limitation, genocides and
other acts of mass atrocities identified by the United States
Holocaust Memorial Museum:
(1) Killing members of the group;
(2) Causing serious bodily or mental harm to members of the
group;
(3) Deliberately inflicting on the group conditions of life
calculated to bring about its physical destruction in whole or in part;
(4) Imposing measures intended to prevent births within the
group; and
(5) Forcibly transferring children of the group to another
group.
(b) “Holocaust” means the systematic, bureaucratic, state-
sponsored persecution and murder of approximately 6,000,000
Jewish persons and 5,000,000 other persons by the Nazi regime and
its collaborators.
Sec. 7. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 385.021,
the terms of the members of the State Board of Education appointed
pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of subsection 1 of that section
who are incumbent on June 30, 2026, expire on that date.
2. On or before July 1, 2026, the Governor shall appoint a
member of the State Board pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1
of NRS 385.021, and the member must take office on July 1, 2026.
The term of a member appointed pursuant to this subsection expires
on July 1, 2027.
3. On or before July 1, 2026, the Governor shall appoint a
member of the State Board pursuant to paragraphs (c) and (d) of
subsection 1 of NRS 385.021, and the members must take office on
July 1, 2026. The terms of members appointed pursuant to this
subsection expire on July 1, 2028.
Sec. 8. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
-
*AB531*

– 11 –
Sec. 9. 1. This section and section 8 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 7, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB531*